Wisconsin, session 2025, AB905.
do enact as follows:AB905,11Section 1. 947.016 (3) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 24, is 2renumbered 947.016 (3) (bm) and amended to read:AB905,2,73947.016 (3) (bm) Health care providers and staff and their family members. 4The person threatens a current or former health care provider or a person who 5works or formerly worked in a health care facility or a family member of a current or 6former health care provider or a person who works or formerly worked in a health 7care facility under all of the following circumstances:AB905,2,1181. At the time of the threat, the person knows or should have known that the 9victim is or was formerly a health care provider or works or formerly worked in a 10health care facility or is a family member of the person who is or was formerly a 11health care provider or who works or formerly worked in a health care facility.AB905,2,15122. The threat is in response to an action occurring at the a health care facility 13or an action by a health care provider acting in his or her official capacity or by an 14official, employee, or agent of the a health care facility acting in his or her official 15capacity.AB905,216Section 2. 947.016 (3) (am) of the statutes is created to read:AB905,2,1717947.016 (3) (am) In this subsection:AB905,2,18181. “Health care facility” has the meaning given in s. 940.51 (12).AB905,2,19192. “Health care provider” has the meaning given in s. 940.51 (13).AB905,2,2020